Wisconsin, session 2025, SB696.
do enact as follows:SB696,11Section 1. 60.23 (32) (b) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB696,2,3260.23 (32) (b) 4. The 12 18 percent limit described under s. 66.1105 (4) (gm) 4. 3c. shall be 5 percent with regard to the town of Cable acting under subd. 2.SB696,24Section 2. 66.0602 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB696,2,14566.0602 (1) (d) “Valuation factor” means a percentage equal to the greater of 6either the percentage change in the political subdivision’s January 1 equalized 7value due to new construction less improvements removed between the previous 8year and the current or 0 percent. For a tax incremental district created after 9December 31, 2024, and for Tax Incremental District Number 10 created by the 10common council of the city of Evansville, and for Tax Incremental District Number 1114 created by the common council of the city of Stevens Point, the valuation factor 12includes 90 percent of the equalized value increase due to new construction that is 13located in a tax incremental district, but does not include any improvements 14removed in a tax incremental district.SB696,315Section 3. 66.0602 (3) (dm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB696,3,41666.0602 (3) (dm) For a tax incremental district created before January 1, 172025, if If the department of revenue does not certify a value increment for a tax 18incremental district for the current year as a result of the district’s termination, the 19levy increase limit otherwise applicable under this section in the current year to the 20political subdivision in which the district is located is increased by an amount equal 21to the political subdivision’s maximum allowable levy for the immediately 22preceding year, multiplied by a percentage equal to 50 percent of the amount 1determined by dividing the value increment of the terminated tax incremental 2district, calculated for the previous year, by the political subdivision’s equalized 3value, exclusive of any tax incremental district value increments, for the previous 4year, all as determined by the department of revenue.SB696,45Section 4. 66.0602 (3) (dq) of the statutes is repealed.SB696,56Section 5. 66.0602 (3) (ds) of the statutes is amended to read:SB696,3,19766.0602 (3) (ds) For a tax incremental district created before January 1, 2025, 8if If the department of revenue recertifies the tax incremental base of a tax 9incremental district as a result of the district’s subtraction of territory under s. 1066.1105 (4) (h) 2., the levy limit otherwise applicable under this section shall be 11adjusted in the first levy year in which the subtracted territory is not part of the 12value increment. In that year, the political subdivision in which the district is 13located shall increase the levy limit otherwise applicable by an amount equal to the 14political subdivision’s maximum allowable levy for the immediately preceding year, 15multiplied by a percentage equal to 50 percent of the amount determined by 16dividing the value increment of the tax incremental district’s territory that was 17subtracted, calculated for the previous year, by the political subdivision’s equalized 18value, exclusive of any tax incremental district value increments, for the previous 19year, all as determined by the department of revenue.SB696,620Section 6. 66.0602 (3) (dv) of the statutes is repealed.SB696,721Section 7. 66.1105 (2) (cm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB696,4,22266.1105 (2) (cm) “Mixed-use development” means development that contains 23a combination of industrial, commercial, or residential uses, except that lands 1proposed for newly platted residential use, as shown in the project plan, may not 2exceed 35 percent, by area, of the real property within the district.SB696,83Section 8. 66.1105 (2) (f) 1. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB696,4,11466.1105 (2) (f) 1. a. Capital costs including, but not limited to, the actual costs 5of the construction of public works or improvements, new buildings, including 6residential buildings, structures, and fixtures; the demolition, alteration, 7remodeling, repair, or reconstruction of existing buildings, structures, and fixtures 8other than the demolition of listed properties as defined in s. 44.31 (4); the 9acquisition of equipment to service the district; the removal or containment of, or 10the restoration of soil or groundwater affected by, environmental pollution; and the 11clearing and grading of land.SB696,912Section 9. 66.1105 (2) (f) 1. am. of the statutes is created to read:SB696,4,131366.1105 (2) (f) 1. am. Costs to develop, improve, or expand parks.SB696,1014Section 10. 66.1105 (2) (f) 3. of the statutes is repealed.SB696,1115Section 11. 66.1105 (4) (gm) 4. c. of the statutes is amended to read:SB696,5,31666.1105 (4) (gm) 4. c. Except as provided in subs. (10) (c), (16) (d), (17), (18) (c) 173., (20) (b), and (20m) (d) 1., the equalized value of taxable property of the district 18plus the value increment of all existing districts does not exceed 12 18 percent of the 19total equalized value of taxable property within the city. In determining the 20equalized value of taxable property under this subd. 4. c., the department of 21revenue shall base its calculations on the most recent equalized value of taxable 22property of the district that is reported under s. 70.57 (1m) before the date on which 23the resolution under this paragraph is adopted. If the department of revenue 24determines that a local legislative body exceeds the 12 18 percent limit described in 1this subd. 4. c., the department shall notify the city of its noncompliance, in writing, 2not later than December 31 of the year in which the department receives the 3completed application or amendment forms described in sub. (5) (b).SB696,124Section 12. 66.1105 (4) (h) 7. of the statutes is repealed.SB696,135Section 13. 66.1105 (4m) (b) 2m. of the statutes is repealed.SB696,146Section 14. 66.1105 (5) (bn) of the statutes is amended to read:SB696,5,16766.1105 (5) (bn) Notwithstanding the requirement that the total equalized 8value not exceed 12 18 percent, as described in sub. (4) (gm) 4. c., if the village of 9Union Grove created, or attempted to create, tax incremental district number 4 on 10January 1, 2006, based on actions taken by the village board on February 27, 2006, 11the tax incremental base of the district shall be calculated by the department of 12revenue as if the tax incremental district had been created on January 1, 2006, and, 13until the tax incremental district terminates, the department of revenue shall 14allocate tax increments and treat the district in all other respects as if the district 15had been created on January 1, 2006, except that the department of revenue may 16not certify a value increment under par. (b) before 2008.SB696,1517Section 15. 66.1105 (5) (bo) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb696 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb696 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB696 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB696 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB696: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting